Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-216
Mutual company; assessment association; articles of incorporation; contents.

The articles of incorporation of a mutual company or an assessment association may limit the insurance to specified kinds or classes of property, lives, individuals, or liabilities within any subdivision of section 44-201 or the territory within which insurance shall be granted and shall provide the manner in which policyholders of a mutual company shall participate in the profits of the company.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 85, p. 430;

R.S.1913, § 3222;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. V, § 8, p. 610;

C.S.1922, § 7821;

C.S.1929, § 44-408;

R.S.1943, § 44-216;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 62.